sl-SI: Oblika pedala: Nožno stikalo (kompaktno); Pedal v stilu klavirja; Enota s tremi pedali (za digitalni klavir); Drugo
da: Formfaktor for sustainpedal: Fodkontakt (kompakt); Pedal i klaverstil; Tredobbelt pedalenhed (til digitalklaver); Andet
nb: Formfaktor for fortepedal: Fotbryter (kompakt); Pedal i pianostil; Trippelpedalenhet (for digitalt piano); Annet
pt-BR: Pedal de sustain formato: Pedal interruptor (compacto); Pedal estilo piano; Unidade de três pedais (para piano digital); Outros
pt-PT: Formato do pedal de sustain: Interruptor de pé (compacto); Pedal tipo piano; Unidade de pedal triplo (para piano digital); Outro
cs: Provedení sustain pedálu: Nožní spínač (kompaktní); Pedál klavírního typu; Trojpedál (pro digitální piano); Jiné
es: Factor de forma del pedal de sostenido: Interruptor de pedal (compacto); Pedal estilo piano; Unidad de tres pedales (para piano digital); Otro
sk-SK: Tvarové prevedenie sustain pedálu: Nožný spínač (kompaktný); Pedál v klavírnom štýle; Jednotka s 3 pedálmi (pre digitálne piano); Iné
tr: Yastık pedalı form faktörü: Ayak pedalı (kompakt); Piyano tarzı pedal; Üçlü pedal ünitesi (dijital piyano için); Diğer
vi: Hình dạng bàn đạp duy trì: Công tắc chân (nhỏ gọn); Bàn đạp kiểu piano; Bộ ba bàn đạp (cho piano điện); Khác
ro-RO: Factor de formă al pedalei de sustain: Comutator de picior (compact); Pedală stil pian; Unitate cu trei pedale (pentru pian digital); Altele
th: รูปทรงแป้นเหยียบซัสเทน: ฟุตสวิตช์ (แบบกะทัดรัด); เพดัลสไตล์เปียโน; ชุด 3 เพดัล (สำหรับเปียโนไฟฟ้า); อื่นๆ
pl: Forma pedału sustain: Przełącznik nożny (kompaktowy); Pedał w stylu fortepianowym; Listwa z 3 pedałami (do pianina cyfrowego); Inny
de: Bauform des Sustain-Pedals: Fußschalter (kompakt); Klavier-Pedal; Dreifach-Pedaleinheit (für Digitalpiano); Sonstige
hu: Kitartópedál kialakítása: Lábkapcsoló (kompakt); Zongora stílusú pedál; Hármas pedálegység (digitális zongorához); Egyéb
zh-TW: 延音踏板外型規格: 腳踏開關 (輕巧型); 鋼琴式踏板; 三踏板組 (適用於數位鋼琴); 其他
fr: Format de la pédale de sustain: Pédale de commutation (compacte); Pédale de style piano; Pédalier à trois pédales (pour piano numérique); Autre
bg-BG: Форм-фактор на педала за задържане на тона: Крачен превключвател (компактен); Педал тип пиано; Троен педал (за дигитално пиано); Друго
lt-LT: Sostenuto pedalo forma: Kojinis jungiklis (kompaktiškas); Pianino stiliaus pedalas; Trijų pedalų blokas (skaitmeniniam pianinui); Kitas
it: Fattore di forma del pedale sustain: Interruttore a pedale (compatto); Pedale stile pianoforte; Unità a tre pedali (per pianoforte digitale); Altro
sv: Utformning av sustainpedal: Fotkontakt (kompakt); Pedal i pianostil; Trepedalsenhet (för digitalt piano); Övrigt
zh-CN: 延音踏板外形规格: 脚踏开关（紧凑型）; 钢琴式踏板; 三踏板单元（适用于数码钢琴）; 其他
fi: Sustain-pedaalin muoto: Jalkakytkin (kompakti); Pianotyylinen pedaali; Kolmen pedaalin yksikkö (digitaalipianolle); Muu
ru: Формфактор педали сустейна: Ножной переключатель (компактный); Фортепианная педаль; Блок из трех педалей (для цифрового пианино); Другое
ja: サスティンペダルのフォームファクター: フットスイッチ (コンパクト); ピアノスタイルペダル; 3本ペダルユニット (電子ピアノ用); その他
nl: Sustainpedaal vormfactor: Voetschakelaar (compact); Pianostijl-pedaal; Drievoudig pedaal (voor digitale piano); Overig
el: Συντελεστής μορφής πεντάλ Sustain: Ποδοδιακόπτης (συμπαγής); Πεντάλ τύπου πιάνου; Μονάδα τριπλού πεντάλ (για ηλεκτρικό πιάνο); Άλλο
en: Sustain pedal form factor: Footswitch (compact); Piano-style pedal; Triple-pedal unit (for digital piano); Other
hr-HR: Čimbenik oblika sustain pedale: Nožni prekidač (kompaktni); Pedala u stilu klavira; Jedinica s tri pedale (za digitalni klavir); Ostalo
ko: 서스테인 페달 형태 요소: 풋스위치(소형); 피아노형 페달; 3페달 유닛(디지털 피아노용); 기타